Hawaii statutes.
§712-1225 Possession of gambling records in
the second degree. (1) A person commits the offense of possession of
gambling records in the second degree if the person knowingly possesses any
writing, paper, instrument, or article:

(a) Of a kind commonly used in the operation or
promotion of a bookmaking scheme or enterprise; or

(b) Of a kind commonly used in the operation,
promotion, or playing of a lottery or mutuel scheme or enterprise.

(2) Possession of gambling records in the
second degree is a misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1973, c 201, pt of
§1; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next